Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3601.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-3601 to 71-3614 shall be known and may be cited as the Tuberculosis Detection and Prevention Act.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 87.